Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.010

Authority to establish.

The legislative authority of any county may establish, provide, and maintain hospitals for the care and treatment of the indigent, sick, injured, or infirm, and for this purpose the county legislative authority may:

(1) Purchase or lease real property or use lands already owned by the county;

(2) Erect all necessary buildings, make all necessary improvements and repairs and alter any existing building for the use of said hospitals;

(3) Use county moneys, levy taxes, and issue bonds as authorized by law, to raise a sufficient amount of money to pay, finance, or refinance the cost of procuring the site, constructing and operating hospitals, and for the maintenance and capital expenses thereof and all other necessary and proper expenses; and

(4) Accept and hold in trust for the county any grant of land, gift or bequest of money, or any donation for the benefit of the purposes of this chapter, and apply the same in accordance with the terms of the gift.

[ 2024 c 361 s 1; 1984 c 26 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.62.010. Prior: 1947 c 228 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 174 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 6090-1, part.]